lt-LT: Garso duplekso galimybė: Pilnas dupleksas; Pusiau dupleksas; Kita
ja: オーディオ二重機能: 全二重; 半二重; その他
it: Capacità duplex audio: Full duplex; Half duplex; Altro
hr-HR: Mogućnost audio dupleksa: Potpuni dupleks; Polu dupleks; Ostalo
fi: Äänen kaksisuuntainen kyky: Täysi duplex; Puoliduplex; Muu
ru: Возможность дуплексной аудиосвязи: Полный дуплекс; Полудуплекс; Другой
pt-BR: Capacidade duplex de áudio: Full duplex; Half duplex; Outro
nb: Lyd dupleks evne: Full dupleks; Halv dupleks; Annet
zh-CN: 音频双工能力: 全双工; 半双工; 其他
cs: Schopnost audio duplexu: Plný duplex; Poloviční duplex; Jiné
el: Δυνατότητα αμφίδρομης επικοινωνίας ήχου: Πλήρες αμφίδρομο; Μισό αμφίδρομο; Άλλο
hu: Audioduplex-képesség: Teljes duplex; Fél duplex; Egyéb
vi: Khả năng song công âm thanh: Song công toàn phần; Bán song công; Khác
zh-TW: 音訊雙工能力: 全雙工; 半雙工; 其他
sv: Ljudduplexkapacitet: Full duplex; Halv duplex; Övrigt
da: Lyd-dupleks-kapacitet: Fuld duplex; Halv duplex; Andet
en: Audio duplex capability: Full duplex; Half duplex; Other
ko: 오디오 양방향 기능: 전이중; 반이중; 기타
pt-PT: Capacidade duplex de áudio: Full duplex; Half duplex; Outro
tr: Ses dubleks kapasitesi: Tam çift yönlü; Yarım çift yönlü; Diğer
th: ความสามารถดูเพล็กซ์เสียง: ฟูลดูเพล็กซ์; ฮาล์ฟดูเพล็กซ์; อื่นๆ
fr: Capacité audio en duplex: Full duplex; Half-duplex; Autre
es: Capacidad de dúplex de audio: Dúplex completo; Semidúplex; Otros
pl: Tryb dupleksowy audio: Pełny dupleks; Półdupleks; Inne
bg-BG: Възможност за двупосочен аудиопоток: Пълен дуплекс; Полудуплекс; Други
sk-SK: Možnosť duplexného zvuku: Plný duplex; Polovičný duplex; Iné
ro-RO: Capacitate duplex audio: Duplex complet; Semiduplex; Altele
sl-SI: Zmožnost avdio dupleksa: Polni dupleks; Polovični dupleks; Drugo
nl: Audio duplex mogelijkheid: Volledig duplex; Half duplex; Andere
de: Audio‑Duplex‑Fähigkeit: Vollduplex; Halbduplex; Sonstiges